Mississippi, session 2026, HB4150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Mallory Touchstone of Pike County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Burglary-Vehicle, Conspiracy to Commit Crime (2), Identity Theft and Worthless Checks in Pike County, on February 2, 2016, for which she was sentenced to serve four (4) years on each offense to run concurrently in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  Previously, she had been sentenced for Possession of a Controlled Substance with Intent on April 11, 2011, for eight (8) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections and on September 17, 2012 for one (1) year of House Arrest under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released from custody on October 27, 2016, and discharged on December 23, 2018.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.